Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 1. Constitutional Amendments.

Sec. 15.50.010.
Preparation of proposition for constitutional amendment.

The lieutenant governor shall prepare a proposed ballot title and proposition for each amendment to the Constitution of the State of Alaska proposed by the legislature or by a constitutional convention. Each amendment shall be confined to one subject. Within 30 days of the date of adjournment of a legislative session or of the date of adjournment of a constitutional convention, the lieutenant governor shall provide one copy of the proposed ballot title and proposition for each amendment to each member of the legislature and shall make copies available to the public.

The proposition prepared under (a) of this section shall comply with AS

15.80.005

and shall be worded so that a “Yes” vote on the proposition is a vote to adopt the proposed constitutional amendment.

History.

(§ 10.01 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (b), “AS

15.80.005

” was substituted for “AS

15.60.005

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

15.60.005

.

Sec. 15.50.020.
Description of ballot title and proposition.

The ballot title shall, in not more than six words, indicate the general subject of the act.
The proposition shall, in not more than 100 words, give a true and impartial summary of the amendment proposed.

History.

(§ 10.02 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.50.025.
Objection to proposed ballot title and proposition.

A qualified voter, or the Legislature of the State of Alaska acting directly or through the legislative council, who believes that the proposed ballot title and proposition prepared by the lieutenant governor under AS

15.50.010

does not provide a true and impartial summary of the amendment proposed may, within 15 days of the date of mailing of the proposed ballot title and proposition to the members of the legislature, submit to the lieutenant governor a statement of objection to the proposed ballot title and proposition, giving the reasons for objection, and suggesting alternative language revising the wording of the title or proposition.
The lieutenant governor shall consider any objection received before directing that the ballot containing the proposition be prepared by the director.
Not more than 10 days after the deadline for receipt of objections, the lieutenant governor shall advise any person who submitted a statement of objection to the proposed ballot title and proposition of the lieutenant governor’s final decision.

History.

(§ 2 ch 99 SLA 1978; am § 200 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.50.027.
Judicial review.

A qualified voter, or the Legislature of the State of Alaska acting directly or through the legislative council, who has filed with the lieutenant governor a statement of objection to a proposed ballot title and proposition as provided in AS

15.50.025

and who believes that the ballot title and proposition as finally prepared does not provide a true and impartial summary of the amendment proposed may bring an action in the superior court to have the determination reviewed. An action shall be commenced within 45 days of the date of mailing of the proposed ballot title and proposition to members of the legislature as provided in AS

15.50.010

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 99 SLA 1978)

Sec. 15.50.030.
Placing proposition on ballot.

The lieutenant governor shall direct the director to place the ballot title and proposition on the ballot for the next statewide general election held after the amendment proposed by the legislature or held 120 days after the amendment proposed by a constitutional convention.
If there is insufficient time to permit the proposition to be placed on the regular ballot by the director, the lieutenant governor shall direct the director to prepare a separate ballot for the proposition.

History.

(§ 10.03 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 201 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.50.040.
Display of resolution.

The director shall provide each election board with one copy of the resolution proposing the constitutional amendment by the legislature or by the convention, and the election board shall display the copy of the resolution in a conspicuous place in the room where the election is held.

History.

(§ 10.04 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 202 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 71 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.50.050.
Certification of vote.

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition favor the amendment, the constitutional amendment is adopted, and the lieutenant governor shall so certify.

History.

(§ 10.05 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.50.060.
Effective date.

Unless otherwise provided in the amendment, it becomes effective 30 days after certification.

History.

(§ 10.06 ch 83 SLA 1960)